Utah statutes.
4-9-11.   Advertisement of packaged commodity sales -- Requirements.

An advertisement which promotes a packaged commodity with the retail price stated shall plainly and conspicuously advertise the quantity required to appear on the package.  If a dual quantity declaration is required by law, only the declaration that sets forth the quantity in terms of the smaller unit of weight or measure need appear in the advertisement.



Amended by Chapter 19, 1985 General Session

